Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Acquisition of Voting
Machines

125.310.
Definitions
for KRS 125.310 to 125.430. [Repealed.]

125.320.
Powers
and duties of commission as to voting machines. [Repealed.]

125.330.
Financing
voting machine projects. [Repealed.]

125.340.
Procedure
for acquiring voting machines. [Repealed.]

125.350.
Negotiable
and tax-free character of bonds; source of payment. [Repealed.]

125.360.
Ways
in which money received may be used. [Repealed.]

125.370.
Sinking
Fund Reserve. [Repealed.]

125.380.
One
or more counties; one or more bond issues. [Repealed.]

125.390.
Action
after termination of lease. [Repealed.]

125.400.
More
than one bond issue for same county. [Repealed.]

125.410.
Bondholder’s
right to proceed. [Repealed.]

125.420.
Refunding
bonds. [Repealed.]

125.430.
Additional
and alternative character of KRS 125.310 to 125.430. [Repealed.]

125.990.
Penalties.
[Repealed.]